District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Initiative Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 16 of the District of Columbia Election Code of 1955, approved August
12, 1955 (69 Stat. 699; D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.16) is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by adding a new subparagraph (E) to read as
follows:
“(E) The measure would be subject to appropriations prior to becoming
effective.”.
(2) A new paragraph (1B) is added to read as follows:
“(1B) If the measure is a proposed initiative measure, within one business day
after the proposed measure is received by the Board, the Board shall request a fiscal impact
statement from the Office of the Chief Financial Officer, who shall issue a fiscal impact
statement within 15 business days after receipt of the request from the Board.”.

(b) Subsection (c)(4) is repealed.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1)).